Louisiana, session 2026, SB427.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2351, 2352, 2354, 2354.1, 2354.2, 2354.7, 2354.8, and 2357(A)
and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:2351.1 and 2354.10 through 2354.14
are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2351. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Adult" means a person who has attained eighteen years of age.
(2) "Agent" means a person who is any of the following:
(a) Authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of the principal by a
power of attorney for health care; or .
(b) Expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on behalf of the principal
by any other record signed by the principal.
(3) "Anatomical gift" or "gift" means a donation of all or part of a human
body to take effect after the death of the donor for the purpose of transplantation,
therapy, research, or education.
(4) "Authorization" means a legally effective expression of intent
governing acts to be undertaken after the death of the individual, including the
recovery of organs or tissue pursuant to an anatomical gift.
(5) "Consent" means a legally effective permission governing acts to be
undertaken prior to the death of the individual, including premortem
Page 1 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
interventions, tests, procedures, or medications.
(4)(6) "Decedent" means a deceased person whose body or part is or may be
the source of an anatomical gift. The term does not include a stillborn infant and,
subject to restrictions imposed by law, a fetus.
(5)(7) "Disinterested witness" means a witness other than the spouse, child,
parent, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the person who makes,
amends, revokes, or refuses to make an anatomical gift, or an adult who exhibited
special care and concern for the person. The term does not include a recipient of an
anatomical gift in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 17:2353.
(6)(8) "Document of gift" means a donor card or other record used to make
an anatomical gift. The term includes a statement or symbol on a driver's license,
identification card, fishing license, hunting license, or donor registry.
(9) "Donation after brain death" or "DBD" means the recovery of
organs or tissue for transplantation following the determination of death based
on irreversible total cessation of brain function in accordance with R.S. 9:111.
(10) "Donation after circulatory death" or "DCD" means the recovery
of organs or tissue for transplantation following the determination of death
based on irreversible cessation of spontaneous circulatory and respiratory
functions in accordance with R.S. 9:111.
(7)(11) "Donor" means a person whose body or part is the subject of an
anatomical gift.
(8) "Donor registry" means a database that contains records of anatomical
gifts and amendments to or revocations thereof.
(9)(12) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the Louisiana
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, to operate a
vehicle, whether or not conditions are attached to the license or permit.
(10)(13) "Eye bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited, or regulated
under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing,
storage, or distribution of human eyes or portions of human eyes.
(11)(14) "Fishing license" means a license or permit issued by the Louisiana
Page 2 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries to fish as defined in R.S. 56:8, for a
recreational purpose as defined in R.S. 56:8.
(12)(15) "Guardian" means a person appointed by a court to make decisions
regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of a person. The term does
not include a guardian ad litem.
(13)(16) "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under the laws of
any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United States, a state, or a
subdivision of a state.
(14)(17) "Hunting license" means a license or permit issued by the Louisiana
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries to hunt as defined in R.S. 56:8 for a
recreational purpose as defined in R.S. 56:8.
(15)(18) "Identification card" means a card issued by the Louisiana
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles.
(16)(19) "Know" means to have actual knowledge.
(20) "Legally effective" means having binding force under this Part and
not subject to override except as expressly provided by law.
(17)(21) "Minor" means a person who has not yet attained eighteen years of
age.
(18)(22) "Organ procurement organization" means a person designated by the
secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as an eye
bank, organ procurement organization, or tissue bank.
(19)(23) "Parent" means a person whose parental rights have not been
terminated.
(20)(24) "Part" means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human being. The term
does not include the whole body.
(21)(25) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public
corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality,
or any other legal or commercial entity.
(22)(26) "Physician" means a person authorized and licensed to practice
Page 3 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
medicine or osteopathy under the laws of any state.
(23)(27) "Prospective donor" means a person who is dead or near death and
has been determined by a procurement organization to have a part that may be
medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does
not include a person who has made a refusal.
(24)(28) "Reasonably available" means able to be contacted by a an organ
procurement organization without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely
manner consistent with existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an
anatomical gift.
(25)(29) "Recipient" means a person into whose body a part of a decedent has
been or is intended to be transplanted.
(26)(30) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium
or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable
form.
(27)(31) "Refusal" means a record created pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
17:2354.1 legally effective expression of intent not to make an anatomical gift
under this Part, that expressly states an intent to bar or has the legal effect of
barring other persons from making an anatomical gift of a body or part of a person.
(32) "Registry" means a record or database maintained or recognized
by the state that contains records of legally effective anatomical gift decisions,
including authorizations, refusals, amendments, revocations, affirmations of
prior decisions, and indications that no anatomical gift decision should be
recorded.
(28)(33) "Sign" means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record, either of the following:
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol.
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol,
sound, or process.
(29)(34) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession
Page 4 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(30)(35) "Technician" means any individual determined to be qualified to
remove or process parts by an appropriate organization that is licensed, accredited,
or regulated under federal or state law. The term includes an enucleator.
(31)(36) "Tissue" means a portion of the human body other than an organ or
an eye. The term does not include blood unless the blood is donated for the purpose
of research or education.
(32)(37) "Tissue bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited, or
regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing,
processing, storage, or distribution of tissue.
(33)(38) "Transplant hospital" means a hospital that furnishes organ
transplants and other medical and surgical specialty services required for the care of
transplant patients.
§2351.1. Rule of construction
A. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to permit the recovery of an
unpaired vital organ in a manner that causes or hastens the death of the donor,
or prior to death being determined in accordance with R.S. 9:111.
B. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit living organ or
tissue donation that does not result in the death of the donor and is otherwise
authorized by law.
C. Unless expressly provided by law, authorization to make an
anatomical gift after death shall not be construed as consent to any act
undertaken prior to death.
§2352. Applicability; persons who may make an anatomical gift or refusal prior to
the death of the donor
A. The provisions of this Part shall apply to an anatomical gift or amendment,
revocation, or refusal to make an anatomical gift.
B. Subject to the provisions of R.S. 17:2354.2, an anatomical gift or refusal
of a body or part of the donor may be made during his life for the purpose of
transplantation, therapy, research, or education as provided in R.S. 17:2354 by any
Page 5 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
of the following:
(1) An adult donor.
(2) A minor donor, if he who has been emancipated or authorized under state
law to apply for a driver's license who is emancipated pursuant to law or who is
legally married.
(3) An agent of the donor, as defined in R.S. 17:2351, unless the power of
attorney for health care or other record prohibits it.
(4) A parent of the donor, if he is an unemancipated minor.
(5) The guardian of the donor.
* * *
§2354. Manner of executing anatomical gift or refusal prior to death of donor
A. A donor may make an anatomical gift An anatomical gift may be made
by persons as provided by and in accordance with R.S. 17:2352 by any of the
following methods:
(1) Authorizing By a document of gift signed by the donor, including
authorization of a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an
anatomical gift to be imprinted on his on a driver's license, identification card,
fishing license, or hunting license, or registry, as provided by law.
(2) Executing a will.
(3) Any form of communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one
of whom is a disinterested witness, during a terminal illness or injury. By a
document of gift signed by another individual acting at the direction of the
donor if the donor is physically unable to sign, provided the document is
witnessed by two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, and
states that it was signed and witnessed as provided in this Paragraph.
(4) Any form of communication made during a terminal illness or injury
and addressed to a physician or made in the presence of at least one
disinterested adult witness, provided that either of the following occurs:
(a) If communicated to a physician, the communication is promptly
documented in the medical record, including the date, time, and identity of the
Page 6 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
person receiving the communication.
(b) If made in the presence of a disinterested adult witness, the witness
attests to the communication in writing.
B. A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift pursuant
to R.S. 17:2352 may make a gift by a donor card or other record signed by the person
making the gift or by authorizing that a statement or symbol indicating that a gift has
been made be included on a donor registry . If the donor or other person is physically
unable to sign a record, the record may be signed by another person at the direction
of the person making the gift and the record shall:
(1) Be witnessed by two adults, one of whom is a disinterested witness, who
have signed at the request of the person making the gift; and
(2) State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection.
A refusal to make an anatomical gift may be executed in the same
manner and with the same legal effect as an anatomical gift under Subsection
A of this Section.
C. An anatomical gift or refusal executed in accordance with this Section
constitutes a legally effective expression of the donor's intent and shall be given
effect in accordance with this Part. A gift or refusal shall not be revoked,
amended, or overridden except as expressly provided by law. A revocation
under this Part withdraws a prior authorization or refusal and does not itself
constitute an authorization or refusal.
C.D. Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a driver's license,
identification card, fishing license, or hunting license upon which an anatomical gift
is indicated does not invalidate the gift.
D.E. An anatomical gift executed in a will takes effect upon the death of the
donor whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will after the death of
the donor does not invalidate the gift.
§2354.1. Refusal to make anatomical gift; effect
A. A person An individual may refuse to make an anatomical gift of his the
Page 7 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
individual's body or part by executing any of the following: a refusal in any
manner authorized for the execution of an anatomical gift under R.S. 17:2354.
(1) A signed record in accordance with Subsection B of this Section or if he
is physically unable to sign, another person acting at the direction of the person shall
sign.
(2) A will and testament, whether or not the will is admitted to probate or
invalidated after his death.
(3) Any form of communication made by the person during a terminal illness
or injury addressed to at least two adults, one of whom is a disinterested witness.
B. A signed record, shall be witnessed by at least two adults, one of whom
is a disinterested witness, and shall state that it has been signed and witnessed as
provided in Subsection A of this Section.
B. A refusal executed pursuant to this Section shall be subject to the
same requirements regarding form, signature, witnesses, authentication, and
recording as applied to the execution of an anatomical gift under R.S. 17:2354.
C. A person who has made a refusal to make an anatomical gift, may amend
or revoke the refusal in any of the following ways:
(1) In the manner provided in Subsection A of this Section for making a
refusal.
(2) By subsequently making an anatomical gift in accordance with R.S.
17:2354 that is inconsistent with the refusal.
(3) By destroying or canceling the record or a portion thereof evidencing the
refusal, with the intent of revocation.
C. A refusal executed in accordance with this Section constitutes a legally
effective expression of the individual's intent and shall be given full force and
effect under this Part.
D. Except as otherwise provided in R.S. 17:2354.2, in the absence of an
express contrary indication set forth in the refusal, an unrevoked refusal bars all
other persons from making an anatomical gift of the body or part of the person
individual.
Page 8 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
E. A refusal may be amended or revoked only in the manner provided
in this Part.
F. A refusal may include limitations or special instructions, which shall
be honored to the extent permitted by law.
G. A revocation of a refusal is a neutral act that withdraws the prior
refusal, does not constitute an anatomical gift, and results in no anatomical gift
decision being in effect unless and until a new authorization or refusal is made
in accordance with this Part.
§2354.2. Preclusive effect of anatomical gift; amendment; revocation
A. Except as otherwise provided in Subsection G of this Section and subject
Subject to Subsection F of this Section, in the absence of an express, contrary
indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is barred from making,
amending, or revoking an anatomical gift of the body or part of the donor if the gift
complies with R.S. 17:2354 or 2356 was executed in accordance with R.S. 17:2354
and has not been amended or revoked in accordance with R.S. 17:2356.
B. A revocation of a an anatomical gift in accordance with R.S. 17:2356 is
not a refusal and does not bar another person from making an anatomical gift of the
body or part of the donor a neutral act that withdraws the prior anatomical gift,
does not constitute a refusal for purposes of this Part, and results in no
anatomical gift decision being in effect unless and until a new authorization or
refusal is made in accordance with this Part.
C. If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical gift of the
body or part or of the donor in accordance with R.S. 17:2354 or amends a gift of the
body or part of the donor in accordance with R.S. 17:2356, another person may not
make, amend, or revoke the gift, in accordance with R.S. 17:2356.
D. A revocation of an anatomical gift of the body or part of a donor in
accordance with R.S. 17:2356 by a person other than the donor does not bar another
person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part in accordance with R.S.
17:2354 or 2356 withdraws the prior gift but does not constitute a refusal and
does not bar another person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part
Page 9 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
in accordance with this Part.
E. In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift of a part is neither
a refusal to give another part nor a limitation on the making of a gift of another part
at a later time by the donor or another person.
F. In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other
person authorized to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift of a part for one or
more of the purposes in R.S. 17:2352 is not a limitation on the making of an
anatomical gift of the part for any other purpose in accordance with R.S. 17:2354 or
2356.
G. If an unemancipated minor donor dies, his reasonably available parent
may revoke or amend the anatomical gift.
* * *
§2354.7. Law governing validity; choice of law; presumption
A. A valid document of gift shall be executed An anatomical gift decision,
including an authorization or refusal, is valid if it is made in accordance with the
provisions of this Part, the laws of the state or country where it was executed made,
or the laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical gift was
domiciled, has a place of residence resided, or was a national at the time the
document of gift was executed anatomical gift decision was made.
B. If a document of gift an anatomical gift decision is valid in accordance
with this Part, the law of this state governs the interpretation of the document of gift
and effect of the anatomical gift decision.
C. A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment thereto an
anatomical gift decision or amendment thereto is valid unless that person knows
that it is not validly executed made or it was revoked.
D. If multiple anatomical gift decisions exist, including decisions made
in another state or country, the most recent legally effective authorization or
refusal shall control.
E. If the laws of another state or country conflict with the provisions of
Page 10 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
this Part, the provisions of this Part shall govern the determination of the effect
of the anatomical gift decision.
F. An anatomical gift decision made by a minor, except as provided by
R.S. 17:2352(B)(2) or R.S. 17:2354(A), shall not constitute a legally effective
authorization or refusal in this state.
§2354.8. Donor registry Registry
A. The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health may establish or
contract for the establishment of a donor registry.
B. The Louisiana Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of
motor vehicles, and the Louisiana Department of Wildlife and Fisheries shall
cooperate with any person administering any donor registry that this state
establishes, contracts for, or recognizes for the purpose of transferring to the donor
registry all relevant information regarding the making, amendment to, or revocation
of an anatomical gift an individual's anatomical gift decision, including
authorization, refusal, amendment, revocation of a prior authorization or
refusal, affirmation of a previously recorded decision, indication that no
anatomical gift decision should be recorded, or informational indication in the
case of a minor.
C. A donor registry shall be accessible seven days a week, twenty-four hours
a day and allow each of the following:
(1) A donor An individual or other person authorized in accordance with
R.S. 17:2352 to include on the donor registry a statement or symbol that the donor
individual has made, amended, or revoked an anatomical gift or amended an
anatomical gift decision, revoked a prior authorization or refusal, affirmed a
previously recorded authorization or refusal, or has indicated that no
anatomical gift decision should be recorded.
(2) A procurement organization to obtain relevant information from the
registry to determine, at or near death of the donor or a prospective donor, whether
the donor or prospective donor has made, amended, or revoked an anatomical gift
individual, whether the individual has made or amended an anatomical gift
Page 11 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
decision, revoked a prior authorization or refusal, affirmed a previously
recorded authorization or refusal, or whether no anatomical gift decision is
recorded.
D. Personally identifiable information on a donor registry may not be used
or disclosed without the express consent of the donor individual, prospective donor,
or person that made the anatomical gift, for any purpose except to determine, at or
near the death of the donor individual, whether he the individual has made,
amended, or revoked an anatomical gift or amended an anatomical gift decision,
revoked a prior authorization or refusal, affirmed a previously recorded
authorization or refusal, or whether no anatomical gift decision is recorded.
E. This Section does not prohibit any person from creating or maintaining a
donor registry that is not established by or contracted with the state. Any such
registry shall comply with Subsections C and D of this Section and shall not
supersede the registry recognized by the state under this Section unless the
record is in accordance with R.S. 17:2354.7. A revocation recorded in the
registry withdraws a prior authorization or refusal and results in no anatomical
gift decision being recorded unless and until a new authorization or refusal is
made.
* * *
§2354.10. Anatomical gifts by minors
A. No state agency, political subdivision, department, office, or
contractor thereof, including the office responsible for the issuance of driver's
licenses or identification cards, shall solicit, query, or request from a minor any
authorization for or refusal to make an anatomical gift in the absence of a
parent or legal guardian.
B. No representation by a minor concerning anatomical gift
authorization or refusal shall be recorded, relied upon, or given legal effect
unless made in the presence of a parent or legal guardian who affirmatively and
expressly concurs in writing in the decision of the minor.
C. Any representation made by a minor concerning an anatomical gift
Page 12 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
authorization or refusal, when made in the presence of and with the affirmative
and express written concurrence of a parent or legal guardian, may be recorded
solely for informational purposes and shall not be legally operative prior to the
minor attaining the age of majority.
D. Upon attainment of the age of majority, any informational record of
anatomical gift authorization or refusal made by the individual as a minor in
accordance with this Section shall become legally operative unless the individual
affirmatively amends or revokes the record in accordance with law.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of this Part, this Section shall not
apply to a minor who is emancipated pursuant to law or who is legally married,
and the individual shall be treated as an adult for purposes of this Part.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit the authority of a
parent or legal guardian to make or refuse an anatomical gift on behalf of a
minor as otherwise provided by law.
§2354.11. Premortem interventions; definitions; prohibitions
A. For purposes of this Section, "premortem intervention" means any
medical procedure, test, medication, cannulation, or other intervention
undertaken prior to the determination of death for the purpose of facilitating
organ or tissue recovery.
B. No premortem intervention shall be performed unless it is medically
indicated for the direct benefit of the patient or is performed pursuant to a
legally effective consent applicable to premortem interventions, as provided in
this Section.
C. Regardless of consent, no person shall perform or direct any
premortem intervention that has a material likelihood of any of the following:
(1) Hastening death.
(2) Manufacturing, accelerating, or securing irreversibility of
circulatory, respiratory, or neurologic cessation.
(3) Preventing or materially interfering with the restoration or
resumption of circulatory, respiratory, or neurologic function.
Page 13 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
D. Any physician or individual who performs or directs a premortem
intervention shall be independent of, and shall not participate in, the recovery
or transplantation of any organ or tissue from the individual, and shall not be
a member of the transplant team.
E. Authorization to make an anatomical gift after death does not
constitute consent to any premortem intervention, test, procedure, or
medication. Consent for any premortem intervention shall be separately and
expressly obtained and shall be legally effective only if the following occur:
(1) The consent is given by the patient, or by another person legally
authorized under Louisiana law to consent to medical treatment on behalf of the
patient.
(2) The consent is voluntary and informed.
(3) The nature and purpose of the premortem intervention are
specifically described.
(4) The patient or other person authorized to consent is informed that
the intervention is performed for the purpose of facilitating organ or tissue
recovery and is not medically indicated for the care or treatment of the patient.
(5) The consent does not authorize any premortem intervention that
poses a material risk of causing or hastening the death of the patient, or a
material risk of interfering with the determination of death in accordance with
R.S. 9:111.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter the standards for
determination of death under R.S. 9:111 or to authorize any practice
inconsistent with that Section.
G. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit the provision of
comfort care, palliative treatment, or the withdrawal or withholding of
life-sustaining treatment in accordance with applicable law and accepted
medical standards.
§2354.12. Post-determination handling and transport of the decedent
A. This Section applies following the determination and pronouncement
Page 14 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
of death under R.S. 9:111 and the recovery of any organ or tissue pursuant to
an anatomical gift.
B. Prior to the recovery of organs or tissue, the individual authorized to
make an anatomical gift, or the individual's authorized representative where
applicable, shall be informed in writing of any plan to do any of the following:
(1) Transport the decedent from the hospital or facility where death was
determined to another facility for further organ or tissue recovery, processing,
or handling.
(2) Continue mechanical ventilation, perfusion, or other artificial
support of bodily functions following the determination of death for purposes
related to organ or tissue recovery.
C. No transport or continuation of mechanical support described in
Subsection B of this Section shall occur unless expressly authorized as part of
a legally effective authorization applicable to post-determination handling and
transport.
D. Authorization to make an anatomical gift after death shall not, by
itself, constitute authorization for transport of the decedent to a nonhospital
facility or for continuation of mechanical support following death
determination.
E. Any handling or transport of the decedent following death
determination and organ or tissue recovery shall be conducted in a manner
consistent with the dignity of the decedent and with the reasonable expectations
of the family, as informed by the disclosures made under this Section.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit the recovery of
organs or tissue otherwise authorized by law, to alter the standards for
determination of death under R.S. 9:111, or, except to the extent necessary to
carry out a valid anatomical gift, to alter or transfer the custodial authority of
the person or persons authorized by law to control disposition of the body.
§2354.13. Effect of anatomical gift decisions
A. An authorization recorded in the registry constitutes a legally
Page 15 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
effective expression of intent and supersedes any prior refusal.
B. A refusal recorded in the registry constitutes a legally effective
expression of intent and supersedes any prior authorization.
C. The most recent authorization or refusal recorded in the registry shall
control.
D. The absence of a recorded authorization or refusal indicates that no
anatomical gift decision has been recorded in the registry and shall not
constitute authorization or refusal.
E. A response to a query by the office of motor vehicles or other state
agency indicating that no anatomical gift decision should be recorded shall not
constitute an authorization or refusal and shall have no legal effect.
F. An informational indication made by a minor shall not constitute a
legally effective authorization or refusal.
§2354.14. Out-of-state anatomical gift decisions; effect
A. An anatomical gift decision, including an authorization or refusal,
made in another state that is valid under the laws of that state or of this state
shall be recognized as a legally effective anatomical gift decision in this state.
B. The effect of an anatomical gift decision recognized under this Section
shall be determined in accordance with the laws of this state.
C. If multiple anatomical gift decisions exist, including decisions made
in another state, the most recent legally effective authorization or refusal shall
control.
D. If the laws of another state conflict with the provisions of this Part, the
provisions of this Part shall govern the determination of the effect of the
anatomical gift decision.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of another state's law, an anatomical
gift decision made by a minor shall not constitute a legally effective
authorization or refusal in this state.
* * *
§2357. Rights and duties of procurement organizations; others
Page 16 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 427 ENROLLED
A. When a hospital refers a person at or near death to a procurement
organization, the procurement organization shall make a reasonable search of the
records of the office of motor vehicles and any known donor the registry recognized
under R.S. 17:2354.8 to ascertain whether the person has made an anatomical gift
or amended an anatomical gift decision, revoked a prior authorization or
refusal, affirmed a previously recorded authorization or refusal, or whether no
anatomical gift decision is recorded.
* * *
F. Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a refusal has
made an informational indication regarding anatomical gift status, unless a
procurement organization knows he was legally married or emancipated, it shall
conduct a reasonable search for his parents and provide them with an opportunity to
revoke or amend the anatomical gift or the refusal. make an anatomical gift
decision in accordance with this Part. Any informational indication recorded
in the registry with respect to a minor shall not constitute a legally effective
authorization or refusal but may be considered by the persons authorized to
make an anatomical gift on behalf of the minor.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 17 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.